Illinois, session 104th, HB5331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $3,200,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Metro 6Pier and Exposition Authority Trust Fund to the Department of 7Agriculture for grants under the Illinois Local Food 8Infrastructure Grant Program. 9    Section 10. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 11State Toll Highway Authority Fund to the Department of 12Agriculture for competitive grants to the governments of Cook 13County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake County, McHenry 14County, and Will County and municipal governments in those 15counties, as well as nonprofit organizations in those 16counties, for programming funding to support projects, 17including agriculture-related education, workforce 18development, farmers markets, local food programs, community 19gardens, and community events. 20    Section 15. The amount of $22,500,000, or so much of that 21amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 22State Toll Highway Authority Fund to the Department of   HB5331- 2 -LRB104 17744 BDA 31175 b1Agriculture for competitive grants to county and municipal 2governments, as well as nonprofit organizations, not including 3the governments of Cook County, DuPage County, Kane County, 4Lake County, McHenry County, and Will County, municipal 5governments in those counties, and nonprofit organizations in 6those counties, for programming funding to support projects, 7including agriculture-related education, workforce 8development, farmers markets, local food programs, community 9gardens, and community events. 10    Section 25. The amount of $2,284,750, or so much of that 11amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Metro 12Pier and Exposition Authority Trust Fund to the Department of 13Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to the 14governments of Cook County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake 15County, McHenry County, and Will County and municipal 16governments in those counties to fund capital improvement 17projects to benefit the agricultural industry, including, but 18not limited to, road improvements on agricultural 19transportation routes, farmers market facility improvements, 20agricultural showcase facility improvements, and energy, 21water, and broadband infrastructure improvements to rural 22areas. 23    Section 30. The amount of $2,562,750, or so much of that 24amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Metro   HB5331- 3 -LRB104 17744 BDA 31175 b1Pier and Exposition Authority Trust Fund to the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to county and 3municipal governments, not including the governments of Cook 4County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake County, McHenry 5County, and Will County and municipal governments in those 6counties, to fund capital improvement projects to benefit the 7agricultural industry, including, but not limited to, road 8improvements on agricultural transportation routes, farmers 9market facility improvements, agricultural showcase facility 10improvements, and energy, water, and broadband infrastructure 11improvements to rural areas. 12    Section 35. The amount of $18,000,000, or so much of that 13amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 14State Toll Highway Authority Fund to the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to county and 16municipal governments, not including the governments of Cook 17County, DuPage County, Kane County, Lake County, McHenry 18County, and Will County and municipal governments in those 19counties, to fund capital improvement projects to benefit the 20agricultural industry, including, but not limited to, road 21improvements on agricultural transportation routes, farmers 22market facility improvements, agricultural showcase facility 23improvements, and energy, water, and broadband infrastructure 24improvements to rural areas. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   HB5331- 4 -LRB104 17744 BDA 31175 b12026.